New Jersey, session 222, S109.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.2005, c.244 (C.45:14G-7) is amended to read as follows: 7.    The board shall: a.     Establish criteria and standards for licensure at least commensurate with national accreditation standards adopted by the American Association of [Polysomnographic] Sleep Technologists or the American Academy of Sleep Medicine or the Committee on Accreditation for [Polysomnography] Polysomnographic Technologist Education; b.    Review the qualification of applicants for licensure; c.     Insure proper conduct and standards of practice; d.    Issue and renew licenses pursuant to [this act] P.L.2005, c.244 (C.45:14G-1 et seq.); e.     Establish standards for continuing education; f.     Suspend, revoke or decline to renew licenses of polysomnographic technologists, technicians and trainees pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-14 et seq.); g.    Maintain a record of every polysomnographic technologist, technician and trainee licensed in this State; h.    Promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to carry out the provisions of [this act] P.L.2005, c.244 (C.45:14G-1 et seq.), except that the initial rules and regulations may be promulgated by the director; and i.     Establish fees for applications for licensure, examinations, initial licensure, renewals, late renewals, temporary licenses, provisional licenses and for duplication of lost licenses, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1974, c.46 (C.45:1-3.2).  Initial licensing and license renewal fees shall not exceed $150 for polysomnographic technologists or polysomnographic technicians, or $50 for polysomnographic trainees. (cf: P.L.2005, c.244, s.7) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.